District of Columbia statutes.
1-319.02

Promulgation of regulations.

The Mayor is directed to promulgate regulations governing the use of volunteers by agencies, departments, commissions, and instrumentalities of the District of Columbia: Provided, that the District of Columbia Board of Education and the Council of the District of Columbia may promulgate regulations governing their respective use of volunteers.

June 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-12, § 3, 24 DCR 1442
1981 Ed., § 1-305.
1973 Ed., § 1-215b.